src-fst-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
# Noun morphological lexica !


* **LEXICON Vocative**

* **LEXICON Noun1-IS_PTC-OM** is to provide deverbal nouns with +Der/ӧм tags

* **LEXICON Noun1-IS_PTC-AN**

* **LEXICON Noun1-IS_PTC-YSJ**








Basic nouns.

The lexicon for basic nouns is N_ 





This should be phased out 2013-05-07









subsequent Cns vs Vow
* LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC-V/L  ныв:ны нылыс


* LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC-J  ав:ав авйыс

* LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC-K  кытш:кытш кытшкыс

* LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC-M  зон:зон зонмыс

* LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC-T  зеп:зеп зептыс

* LEXICON N_END-IN-J  абай:аба абайыс

* LEXICON N_END-IN-ДДЬ  автомобиль:автомобил автомобильыс
* +Pl:%>%^1Cnsэз CASEPOSSLEX ;  2015-09-04 change to ь%>яс after xfst rules are removed

* LEXICON N_END-IN-ДДЗ  автомобиль:автомобил автомобильыс

* LEXICON N_END-IN-ЛЛЬ  моль:мол молльӧ
2015-09-04 change to ь%>яс after xfst rules are removed

* LEXICON N_END-IN-Ч/ДЗ  автомобиль:автомобил автомобильыс
* LEXICON NMN_END-IN-Ч/ДЗ  автомобиль:автомобил автомобильыс
















## Inflectional lexica 


All nouns follow one contlex "N_"
to begin with here is simply a list of all variant
with no more variants beyond:



* **LEXICON CASEPOSSLEX**



SG1

SG2


SG3

PL1


PL2
PL3


SG1
SG2
SG3
PL1
PL2
PL3

SG1
SG2
SG3
PL1
PL2
PL3



SG1

SG2

SG3

PL1

PL2
PL3


## Case followed by possible clitic






















## Case followed by word end




































+Der/A+Adv:%>а K ;






* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-koi/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>
